Indiana, session 2026, SB213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-2-15.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2024 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 15.5. (a) For purposes
of this section, "qualifying account" means any of the following
owned directly by an individual, either as a sole owner or jointly
with one (1) or more individuals:
(1) A retirement plan described in 4 U.S.C. 114(b)(1).
(2) A securities or commodities account.
(3) A savings or checking account.
(4) Any account substantially similar to an account described
in subdivision (2) or (3).
If an account listed in subdivisions (1) through (4) is owned in
whole or in part by a person or entity other than an individual, the
account is a qualifying account only to the extent it is owned
directly by an individual.
(b) For purposes of this section, "taxpayer" means an individual
subject to taxation under this article.
SB 213—LS 6595/DI 120


(c) For purposes of this section, "theft" means:
(1) an event for which a taxpayer would have been permitted
a deduction as a theft loss under Section 165(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code (as in effect on January 1, 2017); and
(2) the event was either:
(A) a distribution from the taxpayer's qualifying account;
or
(B) a sale, exchange, or liquidation of the taxpayer's stocks,
bonds, certificates of deposit, or similar instruments,
regardless of whether these were held in a qualifying
account;
followed by a payment to another individual or entity within
sixty (60) days of the distribution, sale, exchange, or
liquidation, and for which the distribution, sale, exchange, or
liquidation was induced by the individual or entity.
(d) For purposes of this section, "theft loss" means the amount
that an individual:
(1) would have been permitted to deduct under Section 165(c)
of the Internal Revenue Code (as in effect on January 1, 2017)
as the result of a theft, reduced as provided under Section
165(h)(1) and Section 165(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
(as in effect on January 1, 2017); and
(2) was not permitted to deduct in determining the
individual's federal adjusted gross income under Section 62 of
the Internal Revenue Code.
For an individual who is not a resident of Indiana, the theft loss
amount shall only be the portion of the loss derived from Indiana
sources and only if the income resulting from the theft would have
been included in the taxpayer's Indiana adjusted gross income.
(e) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, a
taxpayer is entitled to a deduction from the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income for a taxable year if the taxpayer:
(1) incurred a loss as the result of a theft during the taxable
year; and
(2) as a result of the theft, had federal gross income for the
taxable year that would not have been included in the
taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year
under Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code if the theft had
not occurred or been induced.
(f) The amount of the deduction for a taxable year is the lesser
of:
(1) the amount of the theft loss; or
SB 213—LS 6595/DI 120


(2) the amount reported in the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income under IC 6-3-1-3.5(a) for the taxable year that
resulted from the theft or inducement of theft.
(g) A taxpayer wishing to claim a deduction under this section
must first apply to the department for certification of the
deduction and provide all information requested by the
department relating to the theft to the department prior to
claiming the deduction under this section. The following apply:
(1) Upon receipt of a taxpayer's application, the department
shall determine the amount of the deduction for theft losses
that are allowable, if any, under this section and provide
notice of the determination and certification to the taxpayer.
(2) A taxpayer may claim the deduction on the taxpayer's
state tax return or returns only after the department's
determination and only up to the amount certified by the
department as an allowable deduction.
(3) If a taxpayer disagrees with the department's
determination of a theft loss deduction, the taxpayer may
protest the determination of the loss in the same manner and
under the same time periods as a refund denial under
IC 6-8.1-9-1.
(4) An application under this section must be filed on or
before the date of the last day that a refund for the taxable
year can be filed under IC 6-8.1-9-1. An application under this
section shall be treated as an approved extension of the period
for a refund claim that expires thirty (30) days after the
department's determination under this subsection, including
any protest and appeal. An extension under this subsection is
only for the amount of refund that results from a deduction
under this section.
(h) For purposes of this section:
(1) any amounts that an individual received as insurance
payments, reimbursement, or other similar payments in
recovery for a theft loss during the taxable year are not
deductible under this section; and
(2) to the extent that amounts in subdivision (1) are received
in a subsequent taxable year, the individual shall report the
amount received as an addition in determining adjusted gross
income under IC 6-3-1-3.5(a) for purposes of adjusted gross
income tax in the year in which the amount is received, but
only to the extent that the deduction under this section would
have been reduced in the taxable year of the theft had the
SB 213—LS 6595/DI 120


recovery amount been received in the taxable year of the
theft. Any recovery required to be included in Indiana
adjusted gross income as a result of this section shall not be an
addback for purposes of section 2.5 or 2.6 of this chapter.
(i) If a taxpayer claims a deduction under this section for a
taxable year beginning before January 1, 2026, the taxpayer claims
a refund as a result of the deduction, and interest is due on the
refund under IC 6-8.1-9-2(d), then the amount of interest due on
the refund shall be computed from the latest of:
(1) April 15, 2026;
(2) the date the department issues the determination under
subsection (g); or
(3) the date determined under IC 6-8.1-9-2(d).
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
SB 213—LS 6595/DI 120


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 213, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, line 1, delete "IC 6-3-2-30" and insert "IC 6-3-2-15.5".
Page 1, line 3, delete "30." and insert "15.5.".
Page 2, delete lines 16 through 25, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(d) For purposes of this section, "theft loss" means the amount
that an individual:
(1) would have been permitted to deduct under Section 165(c)
of the Internal Revenue Code (as in effect on January 1, 2017)
as the result of a theft, reduced as provided under Section
168(h)(1) and Section 168(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
(as in effect on January 1, 2017); and
(2) was not permitted to deduct in determining the
individual's federal adjusted gross income under Section 62 of
the Internal Revenue Code.
For an individual who is not a resident of Indiana, the theft loss
amount shall only be the portion of the loss derived from Indiana
sources and only if the income resulting from the theft would have
been included in the taxpayer's Indiana adjusted gross income.".
Page 3, between lines 17 and 18, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(4) An application under this section must be filed on or
before the date of the last day that a refund for the taxable
year can be filed under IC 6-8.1-9-1. An application under this
section shall be treated as an approved extension of the period
for a refund claim that expires thirty (30) days after the
department's determination under this subsection, including
any protest and appeal. An extension under this subsection is
only for the amount of refund that results from a deduction
under this section.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 213 as introduced.)
HOLDMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0.
SB 213—LS 6595/DI 120


SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 213 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, line 21, delete "168(h)(1) and Section 168(h)(2)" and insert
"165(h)(1) and Section 165(h)(2)".
(Reference is to SB 213 as printed January 21, 2026.)
HOLDMAN
SB 213—LS 6595/DI 120